California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(F) The parent, guardian, caretaker relative, or family caregiver of an individual with a chronic or other health condition, disability, or functional limitation.

(G) A veteran with a disability rated as total under Section 1155 of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(H) An individual who is medically frail or otherwise has special medical needs, as defined by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, including any of the following individuals:

(i) An individual who is blind or disabled, as defined in Section 1382c of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(ii) An individual
 with a substance use disorder.

(iii) An individual with a disabling mental disorder.

(iv) An individual with a physical, intellectual, or developmental disability that significantly impairs their ability to perform one or more activities of daily living.

(v) An individual with a serious or complex medical condition.

(I) An individual in compliance with the work requirements under the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF).

(J) A member of a household that receives Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits under the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-246) and is not exempt from a work requirement under that act.

(K) An individual participating in a drug addiction or alcoholic treatment and rehabilitation program, as defined in Section 2012(h) of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(L) An inmate or former inmate of a public institution released at any point during the three-month period ending on the first day of that month.

(M) An individual who is pregnant or entitled to postpartum medical assistance under paragraph (5) or (16) of Section 1396(e) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(N) Foster youth or former foster youth under 26 years of age.

(3) “Educational program” includes both of the following:

(A) An institution of higher
 education, as defined in Section 1001 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(B) A program of career and technical education, as defined in Section 2302 of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(4) “Work program” has the meaning as set forth in Section 2015(o)(1) of Title 7 of the United States Code, which includes, among other programs, certain employment and training programs described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of that section, subject to the exclusions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (o) of that section.

(c) The department shall confirm that systems are programmed to maintain coverage with minimal information requests to an applicant or beneficiary by doing both of the following:

(1) Verifying compliance through interfaces with data
 sources that include, but are not limited to, wage data, Medi-Cal eligibility aid codes, Medi-Cal claims and encounter data, and data from the State Department of Social Services.

(2) Allowing individuals the option to add, through consent-based verification platforms and any other means, information to their application or renewal for purposes of verifying compliance.

(d) No sooner than January 1, 2027, pursuant to the requirements set forth in Section 1396a(xx) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as a condition of Medi-Cal eligibility, and following the department’s confirmation that systems are programmed to maintain coverage with minimal data requests to an applicable individual, an applicable individual shall demonstrate work or community engagement.

(1) An applicable individual who applies for the Medi-Cal
 program shall demonstrate work or community engagement for one month immediately preceding the month during which the individual applies for the Medi-Cal program.

(2) An applicable individual enrolled and receiving Medi-Cal services shall demonstrate work or community engagement for any one month during the period between the individual’s most recent determination or redetermination, as applicable, of eligibility and their next regularly scheduled redetermination of eligibility as described in Section 14005.37.

(e) Subject to this subdivision and subdivision (f), an applicable individual demonstrates work or community engagement for a month if they meet one or more of the following conditions with respect to that month, as determined in accordance with criteria established by federal regulation or directives from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services:

(1) The individual works no less than 80 hours.

(2) The individual completes no less than 80 hours of community service.

(3) The individual participates in a work program for no less than 80 hours.

(4) The individual is enrolled in an educational program at least half-time.

(5) The individual engages in any combination of the activities described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, for a total of no less than 80 hours.

(6) The individual has a total monthly income, including, but not limited to, earned income, unemployment benefits, state disability insurance, retirement income, or dividends, that is no less than the applicable
 minimum wage requirement under Section 206 of Title 29 of the United States Code, multiplied by 80 hours.

(7) The individual had an average monthly income, including, but not limited to, earned income, unemployment benefits, state disability insurance, retirement income, or dividends, over the preceding six months that is no less than the applicable minimum wage requirement under Section 206 of Title 29 of the United States Code, multiplied by 80 hours, and is a seasonal worker, as described in Section 45R(d)(5)(B) of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986.

(f) An applicable individual is deemed to have demonstrated work or community engagement under subdivision (d) for a month if, for part or all of the month, the individual either is a specified excluded individual, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), or is any of the following:

(1) An individual under 19 years of age.

(2) An individual entitled to, or enrolled for, benefits under federal Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), or enrolled for benefits under federal Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.).

(3) An individual described in any of subclauses (I) through (VII) of Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(4) An inmate of a public institution at any point during the three-month period ending on the first day of that month.

(5) An individual excluded based on any other federally required or approved exemptions outlined in the state plan or waivers.

(g) An
 applicable individual may be found compliant with work or community engagement under subdivision (b) for that month if they experience a short-term hardship, a short-term hardship is applicable to the individual, and they are otherwise eligible for the short-term hardship.

(h) For purposes of this section, and in accordance with applicable federal law, an applicable individual experiences a short-term hardship event during a month if, for part or all of that month, any of the following is met, as determined in accordance with criteria established by federal regulation or directives from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services:

(1) The individual receives inpatient hospital services, nursing facility services, services in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities, inpatient psychiatric hospital services, or other services of similar
 acuity, including outpatient care relating to other services specified in this paragraph, as determined by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services, and the individual requests a short-term hardship exemption.

(2) The individual resides in a county in which an emergency or disaster was declared by the President of the United States pursuant to the federal National Emergencies Act (50 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) or the federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 5121 et seq.).

(3) The individual resides in a county with an unemployment rate that is at or above the lesser of 8 percent or 1.5 times the national unemployment rate, subject to a request from the department to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(4) The individual or their
 dependent must travel outside of their community for an extended period of time to receive medical services necessary to treat a serious or complex medical condition, as described in Section 1396a(xx)(9)(A)(ii)(V)(ee) of Title 42 of the United States Code, that are not available within their community of residence, and the individual requests a short-term hardship exemption.

(i) For purposes of verifying that an applicable individual has met the requirement to demonstrate work or community engagement under subdivision (e), or determining that the individual is deemed to have demonstrated work or community engagement under subdivision (f) or (g), or determining that the individual is a specified excluded individual under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), the department shall establish processes and use available and reliable information without requiring, where possible and only when sufficient verification has been submitted, the applicable
 individual to submit additional information.

(j) If a county is unable to verify that an applicable individual either has met the requirement to demonstrate work or community engagement under subdivision (e) or was deemed to have demonstrated work or community engagement under subdivision (f) or (g), the county shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide the applicable individual with the notice of noncompliance described in subdivision (k).

(2) Provide the applicable individual with a period of 30 calendar days, beginning on the date on which the notice of noncompliance is received by the individual, to do any of the following:

(A) Make a satisfactory showing of compliance with the requirement for community engagement under subdivision (d).

(B) Make a satisfactory showing that the applicable individual was deemed to have demonstrated work or community engagement under subdivision (f) or (g).

(C) Make a satisfactory showing that the work or community engagement requirement does not apply to the individual on the basis that the individual does not meet the definition of an applicable individual under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(3) Continue to provide the applicable individual with Medi-Cal services during the 30-calendar-day period if the applicable individual is enrolled in the Medi-Cal program.

(4) Deny the applicable individual’s application for the Medi-Cal program, or disenroll the individual from the Medi-Cal program, if no satisfactory showing is made pursuant to paragraph (2) and
 the applicable individual is not a specified excluded individual as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), no later than the end of the month following the month in which the 30-calendar-day period ends.

(5) Before denying the applicable individual’s application or disenrolling the individual, the county shall first do both of the following:

(A) Determine whether there is any other basis for eligibility for the Medi-Cal program or for another insurance affordability program for the individual.

(B) Provide written notice and grant the individual an opportunity for a fair hearing.

(k) The notice of noncompliance provided to an applicable individual shall be on a form prescribed by the department and shall include the name and telephone number of the
 county department worker, county department call center, or other appropriate county department contact that is available to assist applicants and beneficiaries with questions about their notice, and the date the form was completed. A copy of the notice shall be placed in the case file. The notice shall include all of the following information:

(1) How to make a satisfactory showing of compliance with the work or community engagement requirement, including which months will be assessed for work or community engagement, how to show that the beneficiary demonstrated work or community engagement, and how to show that the individual should be deemed to have demonstrated work or community engagement.

(2) How to make a satisfactory showing that the work or community engagement requirement does not apply to the individual on the basis that the individual does not meet the definition of
 an applicable individual, including because the individual meets the criteria for one or more of the categories of a specified excluded individual.

(3) The deadline for providing the information.

(4) A description of how the information should be submitted to the county.

(5) A description of the consequences of noncompliance with work or community engagement requirements and failure to respond to the notice of noncompliance.

(6) How the individual may reapply for the Medi-Cal program if their application is denied or the individual is disenrolled.

(7) Information about short-term hardship events.

(8) The applicable
 individual’s right to request a state hearing, including the procedures for requesting a state hearing and the time limits within which a state hearing must be requested.

(9) The circumstances under which aid will be continued if a state hearing is requested.

(l) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, until regulations are adopted.

(2) The department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2029, for purposes of this section, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of
 Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(m) This section shall remain operative only as long as Section 1396a(xx) of Title 42 of the United States Code (Section 71119 of federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21)) is operative.

(n) (1) This section shall be implemented only after the director determines, and communicates in writing to the Department of Finance, that systems have been programmed for implementation of this section.

(2) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 75.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.7.

(a) Medically needy persons and medically needy family persons are entitled to health care services under Section 14005 providing all eligibility criteria established pursuant to this chapter are met.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, no medically needy family person, medically needy person or state-only Medi-Cal persons shall be entitled to receive health care services pursuant to Section 14005 during any month in which their spend down of excess income
 has not been met.

(c) In the case of a medically needy person, monthly income, as determined, defined, counted, and valued, in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, in excess of the amount required for maintenance established pursuant to Section 14005.12, exclusive of any amounts considered exempt as income under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000), less amounts paid for Medicare and other health insurance premiums shall be the spend down of excess income to be met under Section 14005.9.

(d) In the case of a medically needy family person or state-only Medi-Cal person, monthly income, as determined, defined, counted, and valued, in
 accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, in excess of the amount required for maintenance established pursuant to Section 14005.12, exclusive of any amounts considered exempt as income under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), less amounts paid for Medicare and other health insurance premiums shall be the spend down of excess income to be met under Section 14005.9.

(e) In determining the income of a medically needy person residing in a licensed community care facility, income shall be determined, defined, counted, and valued, in accordance with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, any amount paid to the facility for residential care and support that exceeds the amount needed for maintenance shall be deemed
 unavailable for the purposes of this chapter.

(f) (1) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(A) “SSI” means the federal Supplemental Security Income program established under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act.

(B) “MNL” means the income standard of the Medi-Cal medically needy program defined in Section 14005.12.

(C) Board and care “personal care services” or “PCS” deduction means the income disregard that is applied to a resident in a licensed community care facility, in lieu of the board and care deduction specified in subdivision (e) of Section 14005.7, when the PCS deduction is greater than the board and care deduction.

(2) (A) For purposes of this section, the SSI recipient retention amount is the amount by which the SSI maximum payment amount to an individual residing in a licensed community care facility exceeds the maximum amount that the state allows community care facilities to charge a resident who is an SSI recipient.

(B) For purposes of this section, the personal and incidental needs deduction for an individual residing in a licensed community care facility is either of the following:

(i) If the deduction specified in subdivision (e) is applicable to the individual, the amount, not to exceed the amount by which the SSI recipient retention amount exceeds twenty dollars ($20), nor to be less than zero, by which the sum of the amount that the individual pays to
 their licensed community care facility and the SSI recipient retention amount exceed the sum of the individual’s MNL, the individual’s board and care deduction, and twenty dollars ($20).

(ii) If the deduction specified in paragraph (1) is applicable to the individual, an amount, not to exceed the amount by which the SSI recipient retention amount exceeds twenty dollars ($20), nor to be less than zero, by which the sum of the amount that the individual pays to their community care facility and the SSI
 recipient retention amount exceed the sum of the individual’s MNL, the individual’s PCS deduction and twenty dollars ($20).

(3) In determining the countable income of a medically needy individual residing in a licensed community care facility, the individual shall have deducted from their income the amount specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2).

(g) No later than one month after the effective date of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), the department shall submit to the federal medicaid administrator a state plan amendment seeking approval of the income deduction specified in subdivision (f), and of federal financial participation for the costs resulting
 from that income deduction.

(h) The deduction prescribed by paragraph (3) of subdivision (f) shall be applied no later than the first day of the fourth month after the month in which the department receives approval for the federal financial participation specified in subdivision (g). Until approval for federal financial participation is received by the department, there shall be no deduction under paragraph (3) of subdivision (f).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 67.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.70.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall ensure that its contracts with a health care service plan or health insurer to provide Medi-Cal managed care coverage meet all of the following requirements:

(1) A health care service plan or health insurer shall provide coverage in its bridge plan product to its Medi-Cal managed care enrollees and other individuals that meet the requirements in
 paragraph (2) if the Medi-Cal managed care plan offers a bridge plan product pursuant to Section 100504.5 of the Government Code.

(2) Only the following individuals shall be eligible to enroll in the Medi-Cal managed care plan’s bridge plan product if the Medi-Cal managed care plan offers a bridge plan product:

(A) An individual who is determined to be eligible for the Exchange and whose Medi-Cal coverage or Healthy Families coverage was terminated. In implementing this subparagraph, the Exchange shall adopt processes to ensure that individuals have no gap in coverage to the greatest extent possible. The Exchange shall request approval from the federal government to limit enrollment under this subparagraph to individuals with a family income at or below 250 percent of the federal poverty level.

(B) Other members of
 the modified adjusted gross income household, as defined in Section 100501 of the Government Code, in which there are Medi-Cal or Healthy Families enrollees.

(C) A parent or caretaker relative of a child on Medi-Cal. The Exchange may delay the operative date of this subparagraph until it has the operational capability to implement this subparagraph, but no later than January 1, 2015.

(3) Provide all of the following:

(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2), an individual who is eligible to enroll in a bridge plan product under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall only be eligible to enroll in a bridge plan product offered by the health care service plan or health insurer through which the individual was enrolled prior to eligibility for a bridge plan product as either a Medi-Cal beneficiary or
 as a Healthy Families enrollee.

(B) An individual who is eligible to enroll in a bridge plan product under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) shall only be eligible to enroll in a bridge plan product offered by the health care service plan or health insurer through which the member of the household was enrolled as a Medi-Cal beneficiary or as a Healthy Families enrollee.

(C) The Exchange shall seek federal approval to allow individuals described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) the option to enroll in a different bridge plan product if the individual’s primary care provider is included in the contracted network of the different bridge plan product and either of the following applies to the bridge plan product for which the individual is eligible:

(i) The product is not offered in that individual’s service area.

(ii) The product is not offered as a bridge plan product by the Exchange.

(4) The Medi-Cal managed care plan shall only offer a bridge plan product if the bridge plan product premium contribution amount in the silver category for the eligible individual is equal to, or less than, the premium contribution amount for the lowest cost plan in the silver category that would have been available to that individual without the bridge plan product.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services may enter into a contract with the California Health Benefit Exchange to delegate the implementation of any part of this section to the Exchange.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 1399.849 of the Health and Safety Code and subdivision (a) of Section 10965.3 of
 the Insurance Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may allow a Medi-Cal managed care plan, pursuant to its contract under this section, to limit enrollment into bridge plan products to eligible individuals identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of this section based on limitations in contracted network capacity for bridge plan products as provided in Section 1399.857 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 10753.12 of the Insurance Code.

(d) This section shall become inoperative on the October 1 that is five years after the date that federal approval of the bridge plan option occurs, and, as of the second January 1 thereafter, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before that date deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 5, Sec. 14.   (SB 3 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.   Conditionally inoperative, on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed, by its own provisions, on second January 1 after inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.73.

A person who is otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal benefits under either Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, except for income and resource eligibility, and who is receiving Medi-Cal services for the treatment of multiple sclerosis, shall continue to be eligible to receive benefits only for these services under Medi-Cal, provided that all other conditions of eligibility for the Medi-Cal program are met. These restricted benefits shall continue until
 such time as the person is eligible for, and receives, third party coverage for these treatments. However, restricted benefits under this section shall not continue for more than two years.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14005.75 (as added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1144, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 601.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.75.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) As a result of federal welfare reform, unprecedented numbers of welfare recipients will be leaving welfare for work, and will face time limits on the receipt of aid.

(2) It is in the interest of the state both to encourage welfare recipients to
 seek employment and to ensure the continuity of health coverage for these recipients as they move from welfare to work.

(3) California’s transitional Medi-Cal program is intended to encourage welfare recipients to seek employment and to ensure continuity of health coverage, but various procedural restrictions limit its effectiveness in achieving those goals.

(b) It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature to streamline the transitional Medi-Cal program in order to maximize its effectiveness in assisting persons leaving welfare for work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 51.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.76.

(a) The department shall provide a Medi-Cal beneficiary whose Medi-Cal eligibility is established pursuant to Section 1930 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396u-1) with simple and clear written notice of the availability of the transitional Medi-Cal program and the requirements for that program. This notice shall be provided at the time that Medi-Cal eligibility is conferred to the beneficiary and at least once every six months thereafter.

(b) When a
 beneficiary loses Medi-Cal eligibility established pursuant to Section 1930 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396u-1) for failure to meet reporting requirements, the department shall provide the beneficiary with the notice described in subdivision (a), and a form with simple and clear instructions on how to complete and return the form to the county. The form shall be used to determine whether the beneficiary is eligible for the transitional Medi-Cal program.

(c) The notice and form described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be prepared by the department. The department shall seek input on the notice and form from beneficiaries of aid, beneficiary representatives, and counties.

(d) The department shall review, and if necessary for simplicity and clarity, revise the notice required by subdivision (b) of Section 14005.8 and Section 14005.81. The department shall
 seek input from beneficiaries, beneficiary representatives, and counties.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall become operative nine months after the effective date of this section.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation, as provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 52.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.8.

(a) (1) To the extent required by Subchapter XIX (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, a family who was receiving aid pursuant to a state plan approved under Part A of Subchapter IV (commencing with Section 601) of Title 42 of the United States Code in at least three of the six months immediately preceding the month in which that family became ineligible for that assistance due to increased hours of employment, income from employment,
 or the loss of earned income disregards, shall remain eligible for health care services as provided in this chapter during the immediately succeeding six-month period.

(2) The department shall terminate extensions of health care services authorized by paragraph (1) as required under federal law.

(b) The department shall notify persons eligible under subdivision (a) of their right to continued health care services for each six-month period and a description of their reporting requirement, and the circumstances under which the extension may be terminated. The notice shall also include a Medi-Cal card or other evidence of entitlement to those services.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department, in conformance with federal law, shall offer beneficiaries covered under subdivision (a) the
 option of remaining eligible for health care services provided in this chapter for an additional extension period of six months. Health services shall be continued in as automatic a manner as permitted by federal law, and without any unnecessary paperwork.

(d) During the initial extension period and any additional six-month extension period, the department, consistent with federal law, may, whenever the department determines it to be cost-effective, elect to pay a family’s expenses for premiums, deductibles, coinsurance, or similar costs for health insurance or other health coverage offered by an employer of the caretaker relative or by an employer of the absent parent of the dependent child. If, during the additional six-month extension period, the department elects to pay health premiums and this coverage exists, the beneficiary may be given the opportunity to express his or her preference between continuing the Medi-Cal coverage or obtaining
 health insurance.

(e) During the additional six-month extension period, the department may impose a premium for the health insurance or other health coverage consistent with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) if the department determines that the imposition of a premium is cost-effective.

(f) The department shall adopt emergency regulations in order to comply with mandatory provisions of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) for extension of medical assistance. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(g) This section shall become operative April 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 71.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.84.

(a) The department shall develop and conduct a community outreach and education campaign to assist persons whose Medi-Cal eligibility is established pursuant to Section 1931 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396u-1), to learn about the availability of the transitional Medi-Cal program.

(b) Any managed care plan, local initiative, or county organized health system contracting with the department to provide services to Medi-Cal enrollees shall include in its
 evidence of coverage and marketing materials information about the transitional Medi-Cal program and how to apply for program benefits.

(c) To implement this section, the department may develop and execute a contract or may amend any existing or future outreach campaign contract that it has executed. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any such contract developed and executed, or amended, as required to implement this section shall be exempt from the approval of the Director of General Services and from the Public Contract Code.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation, as provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 55.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.85.

(a) Families who, because of marriage or because separated spouses reunite, lose AFDC eligibility under the chapter because the family no longer meets the need requirement specified in Section 11250 or has increased assets or income, or both, shall be eligible for extended medical benefits as specified under this article for a period not to exceed 12 months.

(b) The department shall seek all federal waivers necessary to implement this section.

(c) This section shall not be implemented until the director has executed a declaration, that shall be retained by the director, that any necessary waivers and federal financial participation have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 197, Sec. 25.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.88.

(a) The department shall contract for an independent evaluation, to be completed no later than January 1, 2001, in order to determine the effect of changes made in the transitional Medi-Cal program by the enactment of Sections 14005.76, 14005.82, 14005.83, 14005.84, 14005.87, 14005.89, and the amendment to Section 14005.85 enacted during the first year of the 1997–98 Regular Session of the Legislature, on the employment of welfare recipients and the continuity of their health coverage.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation, as provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 56.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.89.

(a) The department shall monitor participation rates for transitional Medi-Cal and seek input from beneficiaries, beneficiary representatives, and counties, on a regular basis throughout each year to consider changes in transitional Medi-Cal procedures as may be necessary to ensure that participation rates are at levels that would reasonably be expected, given aid caseload developments. Before any such changes are made, the department shall seek any federal waivers, or obtain other federal approval, that may be necessary to implement the
 changes.

(b) The department shall make the participation rate monitoring data described in subdivision (a) available upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 57.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.9.

(a) The spend down amount of excess income necessary to become eligible for Medi-Cal shall be determined on a monthly basis. No person or family shall be required to incur more than one month’s spend down amount of excess income to become eligible for Medi-Cal prior to being certified as specified in Section 14018.

(b) Once the beneficiary has incurred expenses for Medicare and other health insurance deductibles or coinsurance charges and necessary medical and remedial services that are not subject to payment by a third party and that equal or exceed their spend down of excess income to become eligible for Medi-Cal, the individual is entitled to receive health care services pursuant to Section 14005 if all other applicable conditions of
 eligibility under this chapter are met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 68.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.95.

(a) For persons in long-term care, any income deductions, with the exception of other health insurance premiums under Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, shall not be deducted in the post-eligibility treatment of income determination pursuant to Section 14051.7 to the extent allowable under federal law or regulations.

(b) Once the beneficiary has medical expenses that are not subject to payment by a third party and are equal to or exceed their long-term care patient liability amount, the individual is entitled to receive health care services pursuant to Section 14005 if all other applicable eligibility criteria established pursuant to this chapter are met. Those medical expenses may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Medicare health insurance deductibles and coinsurance charges.

(2) Other health insurance deductibles and coinsurance charges.

(3) Necessary medical and remedial services.

(4) Expected expenses for inpatient long-term care in a medical facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 86.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.10.

For purposes of facilitating arrangements for health care through prepaid health plans, the department may set standards for determining monthly income, for purposes of eligibility, on the person’s average pattern of income and earnings, subject to subsequent adjustment if actual experience deviates substantially from the amount determined by such method.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14005.1 by Stats. 1971, Ch. 577.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.11.

(a) To the extent required by federal law for qualified beneficiaries enrolled in the federal Medicare Program, the department shall pay the premiums, deductibles, and coinsurance for elderly and disabled persons entitled to benefits under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, whose income does not exceed the federal poverty level and whose resources do not exceed the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14005.62.

(b) The department shall pay, in addition to subdivision (a), applicable additional premiums, deductibles, and coinsurance for drug coverage extended to qualified beneficiaries enrolled in the federal Medicare Program.

(c) The deductible payments required by
 subdivision (b) may be covered by providing the same drug coverage as offered to categorically needy recipients, as defined in Section 14050.1.

(d) As specified in this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to assist in the payment of Medicare Part B premiums for qualified low-income Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are ineligible for federal sharing or federal contribution for the payment of those premiums.

(e) For a Medi-Cal beneficiary who has a spend down of excess income but who is ineligible for the assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (a), or who is ineligible for any other federally funded assistance for the payment of the beneficiary’s Medicare Part B premium, the department shall pay for the beneficiary’s Medicare Part B premium in the month following each month that the beneficiary’s spend down of excess income has been met.
